California, session 20252026, AB317.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California First Time Homeowner Dream Act.SEC. 2. Section 21080.59 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.59. (a) This division does not apply to the new construction of a single-family dwelling that meets all of the following criteria:(1) The single-family dwelling is 1,500 square feet or less with no more than three bedrooms.(2) The property is intended to be sold, or transferred for less than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).(3) The property is intended to be sold or transferred to a first-time homebuyer. home buyer.(4) The applicable lead agency determines that the developer of the project or the property owner provided sufficient legal commitments to meet the requirements of this subdivision. (b) If the lead agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and the lead agency determines to approve or carry out that project, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and the county clerk of the county in which the project is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.SEC. 3.Section 2636.3 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:2636.3.(a)Notwithstanding any other law, payment of property taxes for a property shall be deferred, without penalty or interest, if all of the following apply:(1)The property is zoned for residential use and contains one newly constructed single-family dwelling that is 1,500 square feet or less with no more than three bedrooms.(2)The property owner does not intend to occupy or use the property, and has notified the assessor pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 75.12, or meets the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 75.12.(3)The property is intended to be sold or transferred for less than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).(4)The property is intended to be sold or transferred to a first-time homebuyer.(5)The property owner requests deferment with the county assessor within 30 days of receiving the first tax bill for the property.(b)(1)Payment of property taxes that have been deferred pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deferred until a change in ownership occurs or until the property owner notifies the assessor pursuant to subdivision (c).(2)First installments of property taxes that have been deferred pursuant to this section, shall be due and payable on December 10, or 30 days after the date the bill is mailed or electronically transmitted to the owner, whichever is later. Second installments of property taxes that have been deferred pursuant to this section shall be due and payable on April 10, or 30 days after the date the bill is mailed or electronically transmitted to the owner, whichever is later.(3)Deferred tax installments that are unpaid shall become delinquent at 5 p.m., or the close of business, whichever is later, of the due date and shall be subject to delinquency penalties as provided by law.(c)(1)The property owner shall notify the assessor within 45 days of the earliest date that any of the following occur:(A)The property changes ownership pursuant to an unrecorded contract of sale.(B)The property is leased or rented.(C)The property is occupied or used by the owner for any purpose other than provided in subdivision (b) of Section 75.12.(D)The property is occupied or used with the owner’s consent for any purpose other than provided in subdivision (b) of Section 75.12.(E)The property is listed for sale, sold, or transferred for greater than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).(2)The failure to provide the assessor the notice required under this subdivision, whether requested or not, shall result in a penalty in the amount specified in Section 482.(d)This section shall not preclude the reassessment of property on the assessment roll for January 1 following the date of completion. SEC. 4.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.